Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB651.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 199.894 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 199.892 to 199.896, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(2) ["Secretary" means secretary for health and family services;
(3) ]"Child Care and Development Fund" has the same meaning as in 45 C.F.R. sec.
98.2;
(3) "Child Care Assistance Program" means Kentucky's child-care subsidy program
providing families with the financial resources to find and afford quality child
care;
(4) "Child-care center" means any child-care center that provides full- or part-time
care, day or night, to four (4) or more children in a nonresidential setting who are
not the children, grandchildren, nieces, nephews, or children in legal custody of the
operator. "Child-care center" shall not include any child-care facility operated by a
religious organization while religious services are being conducted, or a youth
development agency. For the purposes of this section, "youth development agency"
means a program with tax-exempt status under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(c)(3), which
operates continuously throughout the year as an outside-school-hours center for
youth who are six (6) years of age or older, and for which there are no fee or
scheduled-care arrangements with the parent or guardian of the youth served;
(5)[(4)] "Department" means the Department for Community Based Services;[ and]
(6)[(5)] "Family child-care home" means a private home that is the primary residence
of an individual who provides full or part-time care day or night for six (6) or fewer
children who are not the children, siblings, stepchildren, grandchildren, nieces,
nephews, or children in legal custody of the provider; and
(7) "Secretary" means the secretary of the cabinet.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:34 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1816
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 199.892 TO 199.896 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Applicants for the Child Care Assistance Program operated by the cabinet
utilizing federal funds under the Child Care and Development Fund, in
accordance with 45 C.F.R. sec. 98.2, shall have gross income at or below eighty-
five percent (85%) of the state median income to be eligible at application and at
recertification. Income guidelines do not apply to cases approved by the Division
of Protection and Permanency within the cabinet.
(2) The cabinet shall not implement an individual or a family copayment
requirement as a condition for an individual or a family to participate in the
Child Care Assistance Program.
(3) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 9:34 AM Jacketed